Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 5
LICENSING

44-30-501. Licenses - types - rules.

The commission may issue six types of licenses as follows:

Slot machine manufacturer or distributor. A slot machine manufacturer or distributor license is required for all persons who import, manufacture, or distribute slot machines in this state, or who otherwise act as a slot machine manufacturer or distributor. Each license issued pursuant to this subsection (1)(a) shall expire two years from the date of its issuance but may be renewed upon the filing and approval of an application for renewal. The fee for the initial license and all renewals thereof shall be determined by the commission pursuant to rule.

Operator license. (I) An operator license is required for all persons who permit slot machines on their premises or who engage in the business of placing and operating slot machines on the premises of a retailer. Each license issued pursuant to this subsection (1)(b) shall expire two years from the date of its issuance but may be renewed upon the filing and approval of an application for renewal. The fee for the initial license and all renewals thereof shall be determined by the commission pursuant to rule. A licensed operator shall obtain slot machines only from, and shall return or sell slot machines only to, a licensed manufacturer or distributor.

(II) This subsection (1)(b) shall not apply to persons holding retail gaming licenses issued pursuant to subsection (1)(c) of this section.

Retail gaming license. A retail gaming license is required for all persons permitting or conducting limited gaming on their premises. A retail gaming license may only be granted to a retailer. Each person licensed as a retailer shall have and maintain sole and exclusive legal possession of the entire premises for which the retail license is issued. Each license issued pursuant to this subsection (1)(c) shall expire two years from the date of its issuance but may be renewed upon the filing and approval of an application for renewal. The fee for the initial license and all renewals thereof shall be determined by the commission pursuant to rule. A licensed retailer shall obtain slot machines only from, and shall return or sell slot machines only to, a licensed manufacturer or distributor. Slot machine transfers between licensed retailers directly and completely owned by the same person are allowed, if proper notification is given to the division.

Support license. A support license is required for all persons employed in the field of limited gaming and by all gaming employees. No person required to hold a support license shall be an employee of, or assist, any licensee until the person obtains a valid support license. Persons licensed as key employees need not obtain support licenses. The commission may deny a support license to any person discharged for cause from employment by any licensed gaming establishment in this or any other country. Each license issued pursuant to this subsection (1)(d) shall expire two years from the date of its issuance but may be renewed upon the filing and approval of an application for renewal. The fee for the initial license and all renewals thereof shall be determined by the commission pursuant to rule.

Key employee license. Every retail gaming licensee shall have a person in charge of all limited gaming activities available at all times when limited gaming is being conducted. The person in charge shall hold a key employee license. Each license issued pursuant to this subsection (1)(e) shall expire two years from the date of its issuance but may be renewed upon the filing and approval of an application for renewal. The fee for the initial license and all renewals thereof shall be determined by the commission pursuant to rule.

Associated equipment supplier license. An associated equipment supplier license is required for a person who imports, manufactures, or distributes associated equipment in this state, or who otherwise acts as an associated equipment supplier. Slot machine manufacturers or distributors who are licensed in this state and who import, manufacture, or distribute associated equipment need not obtain a separate associated equipment supplier license. Each license issued under this subsection (1)(f) expires two years after the date of its issuance but may be renewed upon the filing and approval of an application for renewal. The commission shall promulgate rules to establish the fees for an initial license and renewal licenses.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 184, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-501 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-502. Key employee - determination of status.

If, in the determination of the commission, an employee of a licensee for limited gaming is a key employee and as such is subject to licensure, the commission shall serve notice of the determination upon the licensee who employed the key employee. In determining whether or not an employee is a key employee, the commission is not restricted by the title of the job performed by the employee but may consider the functions and responsibilities of the employee in making its decision. The licensee shall, within thirty days following receipt of the notice of the commission's determination, present the application for licensing of the employee to the commission or provide documentary evidence that the employee is no longer employed by the licensee. Failure of the licensee to respond as required by this section is grounds for disciplinary action. A person subject to application for licensing as a key employee may make written request to the commission to review its determination of the person's status within the gaming organization. If the commission determines that the person is not a key employee, the person shall be allowed to withdraw his or her application and continue in his or her employment. The request by an employee for review of his or her employment status does not stay the obligation of the licensee to present the employee's application to the commission within the thirty-day period prescribed by this section.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 186, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-503 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-503. Licenses - revocable - nontransferable.

Every license issued pursuant to this article 30 is revocable and nontransferable. No licensee acquires any vested interest or property right in a license. The gaming licenses issued pursuant to this article 30 are only for the particular location initially authorized. The revocable privilege for any license issued or other approval granted is conditioned upon the proper and continuing qualification of the licensee or registrant and upon the discharge of the affirmative responsibility of each licensee or registrant to provide to the regulatory, investigatory, and law enforcement authorities any assistance and information necessary to assure that the policies and requirements of this article 30 are achieved.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 186, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-504 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-504. Operator, slot machine manufacturer or distributor, associated equipment supplier, key employee, support licensee, or retailer - qualifications for licensure.

Before obtaining a license as an operator, slot machine manufacturer or distributor, associated equipment supplier, key employee, support licensee, or retailer, in addition to meeting other requirements of this article 30 or rules of the commission, an applicant must show that he or she is of good moral character. An applicant has the burden of proving his or her qualifications to the satisfaction of the commission. The applicant must submit to and pay for background investigations the commission may order. All payments shall be deposited into the limited gaming fund created in section 44-30-701.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 186, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-505 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-505. Considerations for licensure.

In considering whether a person is of good moral character for purposes of issuing any license pursuant to this article 30, or for any other purposes, the commission may, in addition to all other information, consider whether that person has been denied a gaming license by this or any other jurisdiction, city, state, or country, or whether the person has ever had a gaming license in this or any other jurisdiction, city, state, or country suspended or revoked. The commission may also consider whether a person has ever withdrawn an application for any type of gaming license anywhere and the reasons for the withdrawal.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 187, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-506 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-506. Temporary or conditional licenses.

The commission may issue temporary or conditional licenses with respect to all licenses authorized under this article 30.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 187, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-507 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-507. Delegation of licensing duties.

The commission, at its discretion, may delegate licensing duties described in this part 5 to the division.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 187, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1412), ch. 405, p. 2875, § 3, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-508 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-508. Licensed premises - retail floor plan - definition.

For purposes of this section, "retail floor plan" means a physical layout of the inside of the building in which limited gaming will take place that shows the location of the licensed premises within the building.

The retail floor plan shall be submitted to the commission with an applicant's application for a retail gaming license. Approval of the retail floor plan is subject to commission rules and those rules pertaining to the public health, safety, good order, and general welfare of the cities of Central, Black Hawk, and Cripple Creek. All gaming devices shall be located within the licensed premises of a business.

A licensed retailer may change the physical location of the licensed premises with the approval of the commission, the director, or the director's designee. Failure of the commission, the director, or the director's designee to deny an application to relocate the licensed premises in a building, within thirty days of the application, shall be deemed an approval thereof.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 187, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (HB 21-1296), ch. 386, p. 2585, § 2, effective June 30.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-509 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-509. License - disqualification - criteria.

The commission shall deny a license to any applicant who is disqualified for licensure on the basis of any of the following criteria:

Failure of the applicant to prove by clear and convincing evidence that the applicant is qualified in accordance with the provisions of this article 30;

Failure of the applicant to provide information, documentation, and assurances required by this article 30 or requested by the commission, failure of the applicant to reveal any fact material to qualification, or the supplying of information that is untrue or misleading as to a material fact pertaining to the qualification criteria;

Conviction of the applicant, or any of its officers or directors, or any of its general partners, or any stockholders, limited partners, or other persons having a financial or equity interest of five percent or greater in the applicant, of any of the following:

Service of a sentence upon conviction of a felony in a correctional facility, city or county jail, or community correctional facility or under the supervision of the state board of parole or any probation department within ten years prior to the date of the application, notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-5-101;

Service of a sentence upon conviction of any misdemeanor gambling-related offense or misdemeanor theft by deception in a correctional facility, city or county jail, or community correctional facility or under the supervision of the state board of parole or any probation department within ten years prior to the date of the application, notwithstanding section 24-5-101;

Service of a sentence upon conviction of any misdemeanor involving fraud or misrepresentation in a correctional facility, city or county jail, or community correctional facility or under the supervision of the state board of parole or any probation department within ten years prior to the date of the application, notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-5-101;

Service of a sentence upon conviction of any gambling-related felony or felony involving theft by deception in a correctional facility, city or county jail, or community correctional facility or under the supervision of the state board of parole or any probation department, notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-5-101;

Service of a sentence upon conviction of any felony involving fraud or misrepresentation in a correctional facility, city or county jail, or community correctional facility or under the supervision of the state board of parole or any probation department, notwithstanding the provisions of section 24-5-101;

Current prosecution or pending charges in any jurisdiction against the applicant, or against any person listed in subsection (1)(c) of this section, for any of the offenses enumerated in subsection (1)(c) of this section; except that, at the request of the applicant or the person charged, the commission shall defer decision upon the application during the pendency of the charge;

The identification of the applicant or any person listed in subsection (1)(c) of this section as a career offender or a member of a career offender cartel or an associate of a career offender or a career offender cartel in a manner that creates a reasonable belief that the association is of such a nature as to be inimical to the policy of this article 30 and to gaming operations. For purposes of this section, "career offender" means any person whose behavior is pursued in an occupational manner or context for the purpose of economic gain, utilizing such methods as are deemed criminal violations of the public policy of this state. For purposes of this section, "career offender cartel" means any group of persons who operate together as career offenders.

Refusal to cooperate by the applicant or any person who is required to be qualified under this article 30 with any legislative investigatory body or other official investigatory body of any state or of the United States when the body is engaged in the investigation of crimes relating to gaming, official corruption, or organized crime activity;

The applicant, or any of its officers or directors, or any of its general partners, or any stockholders, limited partners, or other persons having a financial or equity interest of five percent or greater in the applicant is or has been a professional gambler as that term is defined in article 10 of title 18.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 187, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-510 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-510. Applicants and licensees - providing information - criminal history record check.

All applicants for licenses issued by the commission, and all persons holding licenses, including all persons interested, directly or indirectly, in the gaming business or license held by an applicant or licensee, shall upon request by the commission or division provide handwriting exemplars, and each person shall allow himself or herself to be photographed in accordance with procedures established by the commission.

Upon issuance of a formal request or subpoena by the commission to answer or produce information, evidence, or testimony, each applicant and licensee shall comply with the request or subpoena. Where an applicant or licensee, or any employee or person interested, directly or indirectly, in either refuses or fails to comply with a commission request or subpoena, then that person's license or application may be suspended, revoked, or denied, based solely upon such failure or refusal.

With or as a supplement to an application for a license or an application for a finding of suitability pursuant to this article 30, each applicant shall submit a set of fingerprints to the commission. The commission shall forward the fingerprints to the Colorado bureau of investigation for the purpose of conducting a state and national fingerprint-based criminal history record check utilizing records of the Colorado bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation. The commission shall not take final action on the application before receiving the results of the fingerprint-based criminal history record check.

When the results of a fingerprint-based criminal history record check of an applicant performed pursuant to this subsection (3) reveal a record of arrest without a disposition, the commission shall require that applicant to submit to a name-based judicial record check, as defined in section 22-2-119.3 (6)(d).

Nothing in this subsection (3) precludes the commission from making further inquiries into the background of the applicant.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 189, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2019:

(3) amended, (HB 19-1166), ch. 125, p. 563, § 64, effective April 18.

L. 2021:

(3)(a) amended, (HB 21-1296), ch. 386, p. 2586, § 3, effective June 30.

L. 2022:

(3)(b) amended, (HB 22-1270), ch. 114, p. 535, § 60, effective April 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-511 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-511. Application - fee - waiver of confidentiality.

The commission may establish investigation and application fees for the purpose of paying for the administrative costs of the commission and for paying for any background investigations of applicants and others. These fees may vary depending on the type of application, the complexity of the investigation, or the costs of the commission in reviewing the matters involved.

The application form created by the commission shall include a waiver of any right of confidentiality and a provision that allows the information contained in the application to be accessible to law enforcement agents of this or any other state, the government of the United States, any foreign country, or any Indian tribe. The waiver of confidentiality shall extend to any financial or personnel record, wherever maintained.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 189, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-512 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-512. Supplier of licensee - licensure requirements.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person supplying goods, equipment, devices, or services to any licensee in return for payment of a percentage, or calculated upon a percentage, of limited gaming activity or income must obtain an operator license or must be listed on the retailer's license where the limited gaming will take place.

A licensed slot machine manufacturer or distributor need not obtain an operator's license or be listed on a retailer's license for purposes of establishing and administering a fund associated with a multiple-property, linked, progressive slot machine system as defined by the commission, so long as all of the following conditions are met:

The manufacturer or distributor shall deposit in the fund and shall account, subject to supervision by the commission, for that money derived from wagering in machines linked to the system that is due to the manufacturer or distributor pursuant to its agreement with the retail licensee.

The manufacturer or distributor shall maintain a separate account for the fund associated with each progressive system.

The manufacturer or distributor shall retain as compensation only a flat, predetermined fee per machine. Operating costs of the system, including payment of prizes, may be disbursed from the fund.

Machines linked to the system shall be placed only in premises controlled by a licensed operator or retailer.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 189, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-513 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-513. Application - authorization for background investigations.

By signing and filing an application for a license, which is hereby made subject to the perjury laws of this state, the applicant authorizes the commission to obtain information from any source, public or private, in this or any other country, regarding the background or conduct of the applicant and, if the applicant is a partnership or corporation, any of its shareholders, officers, directors, partners, agents, or employees.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 190, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-514 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-514. License - grounds for approval or denial.

The commission may approve or deny any application for a license, in addition to all other conditions and requirements set forth in this article 30 and the rules promulgated pursuant thereto, on the basis of whether it deems the applicant a suitable person to hold the license applied for and whether it considers the proposed location, retail floor plan, or any other conditions suitable. Refusal of an applicant to provide all information requested by the commission or to allow investigation into the applicant's background is grounds for denial of a license. Information requested from the applicant by the commission shall include the applicant's date of birth in addition to other information necessary to identify and investigate fully the record and relevant history of the applicant.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 190, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-515 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-515. Licensed premises - safety conditions - fire and electrical.

The building in which limited gaming will be conducted and the areas where limited gaming will occur shall meet safety standards and conditions for the protection of life and property as determined by the local fire official and the local building official. In making the determinations, the codes adopted by the director of the division of fire prevention and control within the department of public safety pursuant to section 24-33.5-1203.5 constitute the minimum safety standards for limited gaming structures; except that, in connection with structures licensed for limited gaming and operating on or before July 1, 2011, any newly adopted building codes shall not be applied retroactively to structures that were newly constructed or remodeled to accommodate licensed limited gaming.

The local building official and the local historical preservation commission shall work together to ensure that neither historical preservation of existing buildings nor the safety of life are compromised.

A certificate of compliance shall be issued to an applicant for a premises license by the local fire and building officials, and approved by the division of fire prevention and control. A copy of the local inspection report shall be filed with the state division of fire prevention and control. Once the division has deemed that the minimum requirements for fire prevention and control have been met, the division shall approve the certificate of compliance within five working days from receipt of the inspection report. If not acted upon within five days, the certificate of compliance shall be considered approved. The certificate shall be current and valid and shall cover the entire building where limited gaming is conducted.

In advance of any structural or significant change to the building or areas where limited gaming is conducted, the plans for the change shall be submitted by the licensee holding a premises license to the local fire official and the local building official for their review. No changes may be made to the building or areas where limited gaming is conducted until the plans are approved by the local fire official and the local building official.

The division of fire prevention and control and the state historical society shall provide technical assistance to the local building officials, the local fire officials, the local historical preservation commissions, and the commission upon request.

The commission shall act as an appeals board for any owner, fire official, building official, or the division of fire prevention and control who feels aggrieved by fire and life safety requirements or the lack of fire and life safety standards in buildings in which limited gaming will be conducted. If the commission fails to act upon an appeal within fourteen days after its receipt by the commission, the certificate of compliance shall be considered approved.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 190, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-516 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-516. Buildings - accessible to persons with disabilities.

All premises where limited gaming is conducted shall be accessible to and functional for persons with physical disabilities.

An exception to the requirement of subsection (1) of this section may be granted in cases where the local historical preservation commission determines that compliance would result in degradation of the historical significance of the building where limited gaming is conducted.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 191, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-517 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-517. Waiver from liability - state of Colorado - disclosures or publications.

All applicants, registrants, and licensees shall waive liability as to the state of Colorado and its instrumentalities and agents for any damages resulting from any disclosure or publication in any manner, other than a willfully unlawful disclosure or publication, of any material or information acquired during inquiries, investigations, or hearings.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 192, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-518 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-518. Renewal of licenses.

Subject to the power of the commission to deny, revoke, or suspend licenses, any license in force shall be renewed by the commission for the next succeeding license period upon proper application for renewal and payment of license fees and taxes as required by law and the rules of the commission. The license period for a renewed license shall be the same period as the initial license period pursuant to section 44-30-501. In addition, the commission shall reopen licensing hearings at any time at the request of the director, the Colorado bureau of investigation, or any law enforcement authority. The commission shall act upon any application prior to the date of expiration of the current license.

An application for renewal of a license may be filed with the commission up to one hundred twenty days prior to the expiration of the current license, and all license fees and taxes as required by law shall be paid to the commission on or before the date of expiration of the current license. The commission shall set the manner, time, and place at which an application is made.

Upon renewal of any license, the commission shall issue an appropriate renewal certificate or validating device or sticker that shall be attached to each license.

Renewal of a license may be denied by the commission for any violation of article 20 of title 18 or this article 30, or the rules promulgated pursuant thereto, for any reason that would or could have prevented its original issuance, or for any good cause shown.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 192, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-519 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-519. Denial of application.

Any person, or anyone who has an ownership interest of five percent or more in the person:

Whose application has been denied by the commission may not reapply for licensure until at least one year has elapsed from the date of denial;

Who has been denied a license for a second time may not reapply until at least three years have passed since the date of the second denial.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 192, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-520 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-520. Appeal of final action of commission.

Any person aggrieved by a final action of the commission may appeal the final action to the court of appeals pursuant to section 24-4-106.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 192, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-521 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-521. Executive and closed meetings.

The commission may hold executive or closed meetings for any of the following purposes:

Considering applications for licensing when discussing background investigations or personal information;

Meeting with gaming officials of other jurisdictions, the attorney general, the district attorney for either Teller or Gilpin county, or law enforcement officials in connection with possible criminal violations;

Consulting with the executive director, director, employees, or agents of the commission concerning possible criminal violations or any security issues;

Deliberations after hearing evidence in an informal consultation or in a contested case.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 192, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-522 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-522. Communications - privileged and confidential.

Communications among the commission, executive director, and the director relating to licensing, disciplining of licensees, or violations by licensees are privileged and confidential if made lawfully and in the course of or in furtherance of the business of the commission, except pursuant to court order after an in-camera review. The executive director, director, the commission, or any member of the commission may claim this privilege.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 193, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-523 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-523. Summary suspension.

Every license granted pursuant to this article 30 may be summarily suspended by the commission, pending a hearing before the commission, upon any terms and conditions that the commission shall by rule mandate.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 193, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-524 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-524. Suspension or revocation of license - grounds - penalties.

The commission may revoke a license granted pursuant to this article 30 for any cause that would have prevented issuance of the license, including the causes set forth in sections 44-30-509 and 44-30-801.

The commission may suspend or revoke a license granted pursuant to this article 30 for a violation by the licensee or an officer, director, agent, member, or employee of the licensee, after notice to the licensee, the opportunity for a hearing, and upon proof by a preponderance of the evidence as determined by the commission. Violations that may warrant license suspension or revocation include violations of this article 30, any rule promulgated by the commission, any provision of article 33 of this title 44, or any rule promulgated by the executive director pursuant to section 44-33-108 (3), or conviction of a crime. In addition to revocation or suspension, or in lieu of revocation or suspension, the commission may impose a reprimand or a monetary penalty not to exceed the following amounts:

If the licensee is a slot machine manufacturer or distributor, the amount of one hundred thousand dollars;

If the licensee is an associated equipment supplier, the amount of twenty-five thousand dollars;

If the licensee is an operator, the amount of twenty-five thousand dollars;

If the licensee is a retailer, the amount of twenty-five thousand dollars;

If the licensee is a key employee, the amount of five thousand dollars;

If the licensee holds a support license, the sum of two thousand five hundred dollars.

Any monetary penalty received by the commission pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the limited gaming fund established in section 44-30-701.

The civil penalties set forth in this section shall not be a bar to any criminal prosecution or to any civil or administrative prosecution.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 193, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-525 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-525. Commission hearings - testimony.

In any hearing held by the commission pursuant to this article 30, the commission may apply to the district attorney having jurisdiction to prosecute the underlying criminal matter for orders pursuant to section 13-90-118 to compel testimony.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 194, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-526 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-526. Records - confidentiality - exceptions.

Information and records of the commission enumerated by this section are confidential and may not be disclosed except pursuant to a court order. No person may by subpoena, discovery, or statutory authority obtain such information or records. Information and records considered confidential include:

Tax returns of individual licensees;

Credit reports and security reports and procedures of applicants for licenses and other persons seeking or doing business with the commission;

Audit work papers, worksheets, and auditing procedures used by the commission, its agents, or employees; and

Investigative reports concerning violations of law or concerning the backgrounds of licensees, applicants, or other persons prepared by division investigators or investigators from other agencies working with the commission and any work papers related to the reports; except that the commission may in its sole discretion disclose so much of the reports or work papers as it deems necessary and prudent.

This section does not apply to requests for such information or records from the governor, attorney general, state auditor, any of the respective district attorneys of this state, or any federal or state law enforcement agency, or for the use of such information or records by the executive director, director, or commission for official purposes, or by employees of the division of gaming or the department in the performance of their authorized and official duties.

This section may not be construed to make confidential the aggregate tax collections during any reporting period, the names and businesses of licensees, or figures showing the aggregate amount of money bet during any reporting period.

Any person who discloses confidential records or information in violation of the provisions of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501. Any criminal prosecution pursuant to the provisions of this section must be brought within five years from the date the violation occurred.

If the person who violates this section is an officer or employee of the state, in addition to any other penalties or sanctions, the person shall be subject to dismissal if the procedures in section 24-50-125 are followed.

If the person violating the provisions is a present employee or officer of the state who obtained the confidential records or information during their employment, then in any civil action, the subject of which includes the release of such confidential records or information, the person shall be liable for treble damages to any injured party.

If the person violating the provisions is a former employee or officer of the state who obtained the confidential records or information during his or her employment, and if the person executed a written statement with the state agreeing to be held to the confidentiality standards expressed in this subsection (4), then in any civil action, the subject of which includes the release of the records or information after leaving state employment, the former employee or officer shall be liable for treble damages to any injured party.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 194, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(4)(a) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3329, § 789, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-527 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-527. Executive director and director have access to files and records.

The executive director and the director shall have access both physically and electronically to all files and records kept, or required to be maintained, and may contribute to those records.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 195, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-528 as it existed prior to 2018.